Utah statutes.
16-10a-1404.   Revocation of dissolution.
(1)  A corporation may revoke its dissolution within 120 days after the
effective date of the dissolution.
(2)  Revocation of dissolution must be authorized in the same manner as the
dissolution was authorized unless, in the case of authorization pursuant to
Section 16-10a-1402, that authorization permitted revocation by action of the
board of directors alone, in which event the board of directors may revoke the
dissolution without shareholder action.
(3)  After the revocation of dissolution is authorized, the corporation may
revoke the dissolution by delivering to the division for filing articles of
revocation of dissolution, together with a copy of its articles of
dissolution, that set forth:
(a)  the name of the corporation;
(b)  the effective date of the dissolution that was revoked;
(c)  the date that the revocation of dissolution was authorized;
(d)  if pursuant to Subsection (2) the corporation's board of directors or
incorporators revoked the dissolution authorized under Section 16-10a-1401, a
statement to that effect;
(e)  if pursuant to Subsection (2) the corporation's board of directors
revoked a dissolution approved by the shareholders, a statement that the
revocation was permitted by action by the board of directors alone pursuant to
that authorization; and
(f)  if the revocation of dissolution was approved pursuant to Subsection (2)
by the shareholders, the information required by Subsection 16-10a-1403(1)(e).
(4)  Revocation of dissolution is effective as provided in Subsection
16-10a-123(1).  A provision may not be made for a delayed effective date for
revocation pursuant to Subsection 16-10a-123(2).
(5)  When the revocation of dissolution is effective, it relates back to and
takes effect as of the effective date of the dissolution and the corporation
may carry on its business as if dissolution had never occurred.
